Illinois, session 104th, HB1617.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 5changing Section 19-2 and 19-2.5 and by adding Section 2-23 as 6follows: 7    (720 ILCS 5/2-23 new)8    Sec. 2-23. Vehicle security circumvention device. "Vehicle 9security circumvention device" means a device that is capable 10of obtaining, intercepting, or processing information from a 11motor vehicle keyless entry system that would allow entry into 12a motor vehicle or start a motor vehicle, without the owner's 13consent. 14    (720 ILCS 5/19-2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 19-2)15    Sec. 19-2. Possession of burglary tools. 16    (a) A person commits possession of burglary tools when he 17or she possesses any key, tool, instrument, device, or any 18explosive, suitable for use in breaking into a building, 19housetrailer, watercraft, aircraft, motor vehicle, railroad 20car, or any depository designed for the safekeeping of 21property, or any part thereof, with intent to enter that place 22and with intent to commit therein a felony or theft. The trier   HB1617- 2 -LRB104 08087 LNS 18133 b1of fact may infer from the possession of a key designed for 2lock bumping an intent to commit a felony or theft; however, 3this inference does not apply to any peace officer or other 4employee of a law enforcement agency, or to any person or 5agency licensed under the Private Detective, Private Alarm, 6Private Security, Fingerprint Vendor, and Locksmith Act of 72004. For the purposes of this Section, "lock bumping" means a 8lock picking technique for opening a pin tumbler lock using a 9specially-crafted bumpkey.10    (a-5) A person also commits possession of burglary tools 11when he or she, knowingly and with the intent to enter the 12motor vehicle and with the intent to commit therein a felony or 13theft, possesses a vehicle security circumvention device. 14device designed to:15    (a-10) A person commits possession of burglary tools when 16he or she possesses a vehicle security circumvention device 17and that person is not a:18        (1) mechanic;19        (2) new vehicle dealer or used vehicle dealer licensed 20    under Section 5-101 or 5-102 of the Illinois Vehicle Code;21        (3) locksmith licensed under the Private Detective, 22    Private Alarm, Private Security, Fingerprint Vendor, and 23    Locksmith Act of 2004;24        (4) repossession agent; or25        (5) State or local law enforcement officer. 26        (1) unlock or start a motor vehicle without the use or   HB1617- 3 -LRB104 08087 LNS 18133 b1    possession of the key to the motor vehicle; or2        (2) capture or duplicate a signal from the key fob of a 3    motor vehicle to unlock or start the motor vehicle without 4    the use or possession of the key to the motor vehicle.5    (b) Sentence. Possession of burglary tools in violation of 6subsection (a) or (a-5) is a Class 4 felony. Possession of 7burglary tools in violation of subsection (a-10) is a Class C 8misdemeanor. 9(Source: P.A. 102-903, eff. 1-1-23.) 10    (720 ILCS 5/19-2.5)11    Sec. 19-2.5. Unlawful sale of burglary tools.12    (a) For the purposes of this Section:13        "Lock bumping" means a lock picking technique for 14    opening a pin tumbler lock using a specially-crafted 15    bumpkey. 16        "Motor vehicle" has the meaning ascribed to it in the 17    Illinois Vehicle Code. 18    (b) A person commits the offense of unlawful sale of 19burglary tools when he or she knowingly sells or transfers any 20key, including a key designed for lock bumping, or a lock pick 21specifically manufactured or altered for use in breaking into 22a building, housetrailer, watercraft, aircraft, motor vehicle, 23railroad car, or any depository designed for the safekeeping 24of property, or any part of that property.25    (b-5) A person commits unlawful sale of burglary tools   HB1617- 4 -LRB104 08087 LNS 18133 b1when he or she knowingly sells or transfers a vehicle security 2circumvention device with knowledge that the device will be 3used by the person or another to commit a violation of law. 4    (c) This Section does not apply to the sale or transfer of 5any item described in subsection (b) to any peace officer or 6other employee of a law enforcement agency, or to any person or 7agency licensed as a locksmith under the Private Detective, 8Private Alarm, Private Security, Fingerprint Vendor, and 9Locksmith Act of 2004, or to any person engaged in the business 10of towing vehicles, or to any person engaged in the business of 11lawful repossession of property who possesses a valid 12Repossessor-ICC Authorization Card.13    (c-5) Any seller of a vehicle security circumvention 14device in this State who reaches an agreement with a buyer for 15the purchase of the vehicle circumvention device shall conduct 16a criminal background check of the buyer before completing the 17purchase. A seller of a vehicle circumvention device who 18conducts a criminal background check under this Section shall 19not complete the purchase of the device if the background 20check reveals that the buyer has been convicted of a felony. 21    (d) Sentence. Unlawful sale of burglary tools under 22subsection (b) is a Class 4 felony. Unlawful sale of burglary 23tools under subsection (b-5) is a petty offense. 24(Source: P.A. 96-1307, eff. 1-1-11.)